California, session 20252026, SB220.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 130051 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:130051. (a) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority consists of 14 members, as follows:(1) (A) Five members of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors.(B) If the number of members of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors is increased, changed, the authority shall, within 60 days of the increase, change, submit a plan to the Legislature for revising the composition of the authority.(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), on or before July 1, 2027, the authority shall submit a plan to the Legislature for revising the composition of the authority to account for the amendments to the charter of the County of Los Angeles authorized by the voters of the County of Los Angeles at the November 5, 2024, general election.(2) The Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.(3) Two public members and one member of the City Council of the City of Los Angeles appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.(4) (A) Four members, each of whom shall be a mayor or a member of a city council, appointed by the Los Angeles County City Selection Committee. For purposes of the selection of these four members, the County of Los Angeles, excluding the City of Los Angeles, shall be divided into the following four sectors:(i) The North County/San Fernando Valley sector.(ii) The Southwest Corridor sector.(iii) The San Gabriel Valley sector.(iv) The Southeast Long Beach sector.(B) The League of California Cities, Los Angeles County Division, shall define the sectors. Every city within a sector shall be entitled to vote to nominate one or more candidates from that sector for consideration for appointment by the city selection committee. A city’s vote shall be weighted in the same proportion that its population bears to the total population of all cities within the sector.(C) The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be appointed by the city selection committee upon an affirmative vote of its members which represent a majority of the population of all cities within the county, excluding the City of Los Angeles.(D) The members selected by the city selection committee shall serve four-year terms with no limitation on the number of terms that may be served by any individual. The city selection committee may shorten the initial four-year term for one or more of the members for the purpose of ensuring that the members will serve staggered terms.(5) One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor.(b) If the population of the City of Los Angeles, at any time, becomes less than 35 percent of the combined population of all cities in the county, the position of one of the two public members appointed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), as determined by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles by lot, shall be vacated, and the vacant position shall be filled by appointment by the city selection committee pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) from a city not represented by any other member appointed pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).(c)This section shall remain in effect only until December 31, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 2.Section 130051 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:130051.(a)The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority consists of all of the following members:(1)The county executive of the County of Los Angeles.(2)Three public members appointed by the county executive.(3)(A)Each member of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors.(B)If the charter of the County of Los Angeles is amended to change the number of members of the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors or eliminate the office of the elected county executive, the authority shall, within 60 days of the charter amendment, submit a plan to the Legislature for revising the composition of the authority.(4)The Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.(5)Two public members and one member of the city council of the City of Los Angeles appointed by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles.(6)(A)Four members, each of whom shall be a mayor or a member of a city council, appointed by the Los Angeles County City Selection Committee. For purposes of the selection of these four members, the County of Los Angeles, excluding the City of Los Angeles, shall be divided into the following four sectors:(i)The North County/San Fernando Valley sector.(ii)The Southwest Corridor sector.(iii)The San Gabriel Valley sector.(iv)The Southeast Long Beach sector.(B)The League of California Cities, Los Angeles County Division, shall define the sectors. Every city within a sector shall be entitled to vote to nominate one or more candidates from that sector for consideration for appointment by the city selection committee. A city’s vote shall be weighted in the same proportion that its population bears to the total population of all cities within the sector.(C)The members appointed pursuant to this paragraph shall be appointed by the city selection committee upon an affirmative vote of its members which represent a majority of the population of all cities within the county, excluding the City of Los Angeles.(D)The members selected by the city selection committee shall serve four-year terms with no limitation on the number of terms that may be served by any individual. The city selection committee may shorten the initial four-year term for one or more of the members for the purpose of ensuring that the members will serve staggered terms.(7)One nonvoting member appointed by the Governor.(b)If the population of the City of Los Angeles, at any time, becomes less than 35 percent of the combined population of all cities in the county, the position of one of the two public members appointed pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (a), as determined by the Mayor of the City of Los Angeles by lot, shall be vacated, and the vacant position shall be filled by appointment by the city selection committee pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) from a city not represented by any other member appointed pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (a).(c)This section shall take effect on January 1, 2029.SEC. 3.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.